Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.822

Child care subsidy fraud—Referral—Collection of overpayments.

(1) The department must refer all suspected incidents of child care subsidy fraud to the department of social and health services office of fraud and accountability for appropriate investigation and action.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "fraud" has the definition in RCW 74.04.004.

(3) This section does not limit or preclude the department or the department of social and health services from establishing and collecting overpayments consistent with federal regulation or seek other remedies that may be legally available, including but not limited to criminal investigation or prosecution.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 29 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.216.730, 43.215.562.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 29: "The legislature finds that child care providers positively contribute to local communities by offering important services that support the well-being of children and their families. The legislature further recognizes that most child care providers make every effort to ensure that subsidy payments received are correct and align with agency rules. When a child care provider is found to have fraudulently accepted subsidy payments, however, it is the legislature's intent to prohibit such a provider from receiving future child care subsidy payments." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 29 s 1.]